Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-379
Report of abuse; summary by department; when provided.

Upon request, a physician or the person in charge of an institution, facility, or agency making a legally mandated report shall receive a summary of the findings of and actions taken by the department in response to such report. The amount of detail such summary contains and the purposes for which it may be used shall depend on the source of the report and shall be established by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 32.